New York, session 2025-2026, A4205.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "tuition exemption for law enforcement officers act" or the "TELE 3 act". 4 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 669-i to 5 read as follows: 6 § 669-i. Tuition exemption for law enforcement program. 1. Definition. 7 For purposes of this section, "police officer" means a member of a 8 police force or other organization of a municipality who is responsible 9 for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the 10 general criminal laws of the state, but shall not include any person 11 serving as such solely by virtue of occupying any other office or posi- 12 tion, nor shall such term include a sheriff, under-sheriff, commissioner 13 of police, chief of police, deputy or assistant chief of police or any 14 person having an equivalent title who is appointed or employed by a 15 municipality to exercise equivalent supervisory authority. 16 2. Administration. (a) The board of trustees of the state university 17 of New York and the board of trustees of the city university of New York 18 are hereby directed to develop and administer the tuition exemption for 19 law enforcement program. Such program shall be offered exclusively to 20 active-duty police officers to provide an incentive to maintain and 21 increase employment levels at law enforcement agencies. 22 (b) Law enforcement agencies which employ police officers which apply 23 for and receive such tuition exemptions shall monitor and enforce the 24 commitments outlined in this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03670-01-5 A. 4205 2 1 (c) The state university of New York and the city university of New 2 York shall coordinate with law enforcement agencies to verify enrollment 3 and eligibility criteria for the tuition exemption under this section. 4 (d) The state university of New York and the city university of New 5 York shall coordinate with law enforcement agencies to develop an appli- 6 cation process for the tuition exemption under this section. 7 (e) If the grade point average of a participating police officer is 8 less than 3.0, then such officer shall be placed on probation from the 9 tuition exemption program for one semester. If the grade point average 10 does not return to 3.0 or greater within one semester, then such officer 11 shall become ineligible for the tuition exemption program. 12 3. Tuition exemption. Police officers enrolled in full-time or part- 13 time degree programs, including credit and non-credit bearing programs, 14 at the state university of New York or the city university of New York, 15 including community colleges, shall be exempt from tuition and fees for 16 the duration of their enrollment. Such tuition exemption shall be 17 applied to the cost of any courses or programs offered by the state 18 university of New York or the city university of New York. 19 4. Commitment to service. (a) Any police officer benefiting from the 20 tuition exemption under this section shall commit to serving a state or 21 municipal law enforcement agency for a minimum period of: 22 (i) Five years if enrolled in an associate degree or workforce program 23 or until the criteria for retirement from such office are met. 24 (ii) Ten years if enrolled in an undergraduate degree or until the 25 criteria for retirement from such office are met. 26 (iii) Five years if enrolled in a graduate degree or until the crite- 27 ria for retirement from such office are met. 28 (b) Failure to fulfill the commitment outlined in paragraph (a) of 29 this subdivision shall result in such police officer being obligated to 30 repay a proportional amount of the tuition waived, based on the number 31 of years served. 32 (i) If the employment of a police officer is terminated with their 33 respective agency before completing the commitment period specified in 34 this subdivision, such officer shall repay a prorated amount of the 35 tuition waived to the state university of New York or the city universi- 36 ty of New York. 37 (ii) The prorated repayment specified in this subdivision shall be 38 made within a reasonable period determined by the state university of 39 New York or the city university of New York following such police offi- 40 cer's termination of employment or resignation. 41 (c) Should such police officer be injured in the line of duty or 42 removed from their office due to medical necessity, the commitment to 43 service shall be deemed to have been met in full. The agency by which 44 such police officer is employed shall submit proof of injury or medical 45 leave to the state university of New York or the city university of New 46 York. 47 5. Funding. The state university of New York and the city university 48 of New York are hereby directed to establish a police officer tuition 49 exemption account to support this section. Any costs incurred by the 50 state university of New York and the city university of New York from 51 such tuition exemption account shall be reimbursed from the general 52 fund. 53 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 54 it shall have become a law.